Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-4103
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Public Guardianship Act:

(1) Council means the Advisory Council on Public Guardianship;

(2) Multidisciplinary team means the team of professionals hired by the Public Guardian pursuant to section 30-4104;

(3) Office means the Office of Public Guardian;

(4) Private conservator means an individual or a corporation with general power to serve as trustee who is not with the office and who is appointed by the court to act as conservator for a protected person;

(5) Private guardian means any person who is not with the office and who is appointed by the court to act as guardian for a ward;

(6) Protected person is as defined in section 30-2601;

(7) Public Guardian means the director of the office;

(8) Successor conservator means an individual or a corporation with general power to serve as trustee who is recruited by the office to become a conservator for a protected person previously served by the office;

(9) Successor guardian means a person or entity who is recruited by the office to become a guardian for a ward previously served by the office; and

(10) Ward is as defined in section 30-2601.

Laws 2014, LB920, § 3;

Laws 2016, LB934, § 28.